Maryland, session 2025, HB0181.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Safety
13–306.
(a) Officers, warrant officers, and enlisted individuals who are full–time
employees of the Department are in State active duty status.
(b) (1) The [Governor] ADJUTANT GENERAL may appoint a chief of staff and
aides.
(2) The chief of staff and aides serve at the pleasure of the [Governor]
ADJUTANT GENERAL.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, April 8, 2025.
– 1 –